Connecticut, session 2026, HB05529.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section,
"election", "referendum", "municipality" and "elector" have the same
meanings as provided in section 9-1 of the general statutes; "primary"
has the same meaning as provided in section 9-372 of the general
statutes; and "political committee" and "candidate committee" have the
same meanings as provided in section 9-601 of the general statutes.
(b) Not later than fourteen days prior to any election, primary or
referendum held in a municipality, the registrars of voters of such
municipality shall provide notice to each (1) town committee within
such municipality, (2) political committee formed solely to aid or
promote the success or defeat of a referendum question that is to appear
on the ballot at such referendum, and (3) candidate committee of a
candidate whose name is to appear on the ballot at such election or
primary, of whether the poll books containing the official checklist to be
used at such election, primary or referendum for the checking of any
elector appearing at the polling place or location designated for the
conduct of early voting will include an electronic version.
(c) Each registrar of voters who fails to provide notice in accordance
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5529
with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall be fined not
less than fifty dollars.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (b)(2), "that is to appear on the ballot at such referendum" was
added for clarity; and in Subsec. (b)(3), "such election, primary or
referendum" was changed to "such election or primary" for accuracy.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2